Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 18

National Forests, Parks and Development Projects

11-18-101. United States authorized to acquire land.

The consent of the state of Tennessee is given to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase or otherwise, of such lands within the state as in the opinion of the federal government, the state forester and the governor concurring, may be necessary for the establishment and extension of national forests and parks, and the improvement and development of the Tennessee River basin and the Cove Creek project on the Clinch River and Fort Pillow in Lauderdale County; provided, that the property of no one shall be taken under the power of eminent domain without previous negotiation and that in all such proceedings the United States or its agencies shall, for the purpose of guaranteeing uniformity in such proceedings, follow §§ 29-16-101 — 29-16-122, 29-16-202 and 29-16-203 providing for the taking of private property for works of internal improvement.

Acts 1933, ch. 161, § 1; 1937, ch. 223, § 1; 1943, ch. 150, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5201.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-1001; Acts 2014, ch. 927, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. For condemnation proceedings under the Tennessee Valley authority, see 16 U.S.C. §§ 831q and 831x.

11-18-102. Jurisdiction retained by state — Purpose.

As to all lands acquired by the United States within this state for the purposes mentioned in § 11-18-101 or similar purposes, the state does not, by granting this consent, surrender or cede its legislative, executive and judicial jurisdiction over the same, but grants to the congress of the United States the right to enact such laws and make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to protect its title to and possession of such lands as may be acquired by it for such purposes, it being the intent of this section to establish a uniform consent and cession as to all lands owned or acquired by the United States within this state for the above mentioned and all other federal purposes, except those enumerated in the Constitution of the United States, article 1, § 8, to-wit: lands for the erection of forts, magazines, arsenals, dockyards and other needful buildings.

Acts 1933, ch. 161, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5201.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-1002.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Elections — Voting Rights of Residents of Federal Enclave Where Polling Places Are on Land Under Exclusive Federal Jurisdiction, 2 Vand. L. Rev. 304.

11-18-103. Civil and criminal jurisdiction retained — Privileges as citizens retained by inhabitants.

The jurisdiction of the state of Tennessee, both civil and criminal, over persons upon the lands acquired for the purposes named in § 11-18-101, or similar purposes, shall not be affected or changed by their permanent acquisition and administration by the United States for such purposes, except so far as the punishment of offenses against the United States is concerned, the intent and meaning of this section being that the state of Tennessee shall not, by reasons of such acquisition and administration, lose its jurisdiction nor the inhabitants thereof their rights and privileges as citizens or be absolved from their duties as citizens of the state.

Acts 1933, ch. 161, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 5201.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-1003.

11-18-104. Jurisdiction retained over highways and streams.

The state of Tennessee and its governmental or political subdivisions shall retain its and their title and ownership in and to and jurisdiction over all highways and thoroughfares over or contiguous to lands so acquired, and to all bridges and ferries forming parts of such highways or over streams affected thereby, together with the right to locate, relocate and reconstruct roads over such lands, and bridges and ferries over such streams as may be necessary to protect and improve the highways of the state and its subdivisions and to promote the free flow of commerce between the different communities of this state inter sese and other states.

Federal agencies acquiring lands for public improvement in this state shall have no right to destroy or impair the use of any highway, bridge or ferry, public or private, without first compensating or making satisfactory arrangement with the owner thereof for another facility of equal service and value.

Acts 1933, ch. 161, § 4; 1943, ch. 150, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5201.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-1004.

Cross-References. United States authorized to prohibit the use by commercial vehicles of highways within Great Smoky Mountains National Park, § 11-18-107.

11-18-105. Taxing power reserved by state.

The state of Tennessee reserves the right to tax persons and corporations, their franchises and property on land or lands deeded or conveyed as aforementioned and to tax sales of gasoline and other motor vehicle fuels and oil for use in motor vehicles or other means of transportation or any other privilege, trade or business conducted on such lands, and to tax and control motor vehicles or other means of transportation using any highways constructed by the United States on the lands as a result of its improvements within the state.

Acts 1933, ch. 161, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 5201.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-1005.

11-18-106. Chapter applicable to further acquisitions of property — Compliance with conditions to satisfaction of governor and state forester.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect any rights accrued prior to February 11, 1943, but as to any future acquisitions of property by the United States or any of its agencies, this chapter shall be applicable law and the right of cession of jurisdiction over property in the state shall not become effective until all the conditions hereof are complied with to the satisfaction of the governor and state forester.

Acts 1933, ch. 161, § 7; 1943, ch. 150, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 5201.7 (Williams, § 5201.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-1006.

11-18-107. United States authorized to prohibit the use by commercial vehicles of highways within Great Smoky Mountains National Park.

Notwithstanding chapter 57 of the Public Acts of 1951, approved February 23, 1951, and the provisions found in the deed conveying all state highways within the Great Smoky Mountains National Park to the United States, dated June 1, 1951, and recorded in the register's office of Sevier County, on August 6, 1951, in volume 106, page 440; Blount County, on August 25, 1951, in volume 172, page 55; and Cocke County, on October 10, 1951, in volume 71, page 491, the state of Tennessee consents to the United States prohibiting the use by commercial vehicles of U.S. highway 441 and Tennessee highway 73 west of Gatlinburg, within the Great Smoky Mountains National Park when interstate route I-40 is completed from near Newport, to U.S. highway 19 near Waynesville, North Carolina.

Acts 1963, ch. 163, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1007.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1951, ch. 57, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Great Smoky Mountains Park commission, title 11, ch. 19, part 1.

State jurisdiction retained over highways and streams, § 11-18-104.